North Carolina, session 2025, SB976.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. PRESCRIPTION DRUG AFFORDABILITY
SECTION 1.1.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-182. Limits on cost-sharing.
Prescription Drugs. – The cost-sharing for any health benefit plan for the coverage of
prescription drugs shall not exceed the annual amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
covered person. Cost-sharing includes copayments, deductibles, and any other out-of-pocket
expense for a prescription drug paid by the covered individual."
SECTION 1.1.(b) This section is effective October 1, 2026, and applies to insurance
contracts entered into, renewed, or amended on or after that date.

PART II. SURPRISE BILLING AND EMERGENCY PROTECTION
SECTION 2.1.(a) G.S. 58-3-182, as enacted by Section 1.1(a) of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 58-3-182. Limits on cost-sharing.
(a) Prescription Drugs. – The cost-sharing for any health benefit plan for the coverage of
prescription drugs shall not exceed the annual amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
covered person. Cost-sharing includes copayments, deductibles, and any other out-of-pocket
expense for a prescription drug paid by the covered individual.
*S976-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) In-Network Facilities. – All nonemergency care provided at a facility that is part of
the health benefit plan's provider network shall be charged to the covered individual at an
in-network rate. No health benefit plan shall allow for any cost-sharing at an out-of-network rate
so long as the facility in which the care is provided is in the health benefit plan's provider
network."
SECTION 2.1.(b) G.S. 58-3-200(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Services Outside Provider Networks. – No insurer shall penalize an insured or subject
an insured to the out-of-network benefit levels offered under the insured's approved health benefit
plan, including an insured receiving an extended or standing referral under G.S. 58-3-223, unless
contracting health care healthcare providers able to meet health needs of the insured are
reasonably available to the insured without unreasonable delay. Upon notice or request from the
insured, the insurer shall determine whether a healthcare provider able to meet the needs of the
insured is available to the insured without unreasonable delay by reference to the insured's
location and the specific medical needs of the insured."
SECTION 2.1.(c) This section becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to
healthcare services provided on or after that date and to contracts issued, renewed, or amended
on or after that date.
SECTION 2.2. Beginning with the 2027 calendar year, emergency ground
ambulance services shall be considered part of the essential health benefit package under 45
C.F.R. § 147.150(a). The Commissioner of the Department of Insurance shall communicate this
change to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and to all insurers offering a
health benefit plan in North Carolina on the federally facilitated marketplace.

PART III. MEDICAL DEBT PREVENTION
SECTION 3.1.(a) Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article 11C to be entitled "Fair Billing and Collections Practices for Hospitals and Ambulatory
Surgical Facilities."
SECTION 3.1.(b) G.S. 131E-91 is recodified as G.S. 131E-214.50 under Article
11C of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, as created by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 3.1.(c) G.S. 131E-214.50(d), as recodified by subsection (b) of this
section, reads as rewritten:
"(d) Hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities shall abide by the following reasonable
collections practices:
…
(1a) A hospital or ambulatory surgical facility shall not refer a patient's unpaid bill
to a collections agency, entity, or other assignee unless it has first made an
informed decision, based on a screening of the patient, that the patient is not
eligible for charity care or financial assistance under the hospital's or
ambulatory surgical facility's charity care or financial assistance policies.
(1b) A hospital or ambulatory surgical facility shall not report a patient's unpaid
bill to a credit reporting agency until the unpaid bill is at least 180 days past
due.
…."

PART IV. PRICE TRANSPARENCY IN HEALTHCARE
SECTION 4.1.(a) G.S. 131E-214.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-214.13. Disclosure of prices for most frequently reported DRGs, CPTs, and
HCPCSs.
(a) The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Ambulatory surgical facility. – A facility licensed under Part 4 of Article 6 of
this Chapter.
Page 2 Senate Bill 976-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Commission. – The North Carolina Medical Care Commission.
(2a) CPT. – Current Procedural Terminology.
(2b) DRG. – Diagnostic Related Group.
(2c) HCPCS. – The Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System.
(3) Health insurer. – An entity that writes a health benefit plan and is one of the
following:
a. An insurance company under Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
b. A service corporation under Article 65 of Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
c. A health maintenance organization under Article 67 of Chapter 58 of
the General Statutes.
d. A third-party administrator of one or more group health plans, as
defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security
Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. § 1167(1)).
(4) Hospital. – A medical care facility licensed under Article 5 of this Chapter or
under Article 2 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.
(5) Public or private third party. – Includes the State, the federal government,
employers, health insurers, third-party administrators, and managed care
organizations.
(6) Statewide data processor. – As defined in G.S. 131E-214.1.
(b) Beginning with the reporting period ending September 30, 2015, and annually
thereafter, Quarterly Report on Most Frequently Reported DRGs for Inpatients. – On a quarterly
basis, each hospital shall provide to the Department of Health and Human Services statewide
data processor, utilizing electronic health records software, the following information about the
100 most frequently reported admissions by DRG for inpatients as established by the
Department:
(1) The amount that will be charged to a patient for each DRG if all charges are
paid in full without a public or private third party paying for any portion of
the charges. In calculating this amount, each hospital shall include charges for
each billable item and service associated with the DRG regardless of whether
the health service is performed by a physician or nonphysician practitioner
employed by the hospital.
(2) The average negotiated settlement on the amount that will be charged to a
patient required to be provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The amount of Medicaid reimbursement for each DRG, including claims and
pro rata supplemental payments.
(4) The amount of Medicare reimbursement for each DRG.
(5) For each of the five largest health insurers providing payment to the hospital
on behalf of insureds and teachers and State employees, the range and the
average of the amount of payment made for each DRG. Prior to providing this
information to the Department statewide data processor, each hospital shall
redact the names of the health insurers and any other information that would
otherwise identify the health insurers.
A hospital shall not be required to report the information required by this subsection for any
of the 100 most frequently reported admissions where the reporting of that information
reasonably could lead to the identification of the person or persons admitted to the hospital in
violation of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) or
other federal law.
Senate Bill 976-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The Commission shall adopt rules on or before March 1, 2016, to ensure that
subsection (b) of this section is properly implemented and that hospitals report this information
to the Department in a uniform manner. The rules shall include all of the following:
(1) The method by which the Department shall determine the 100 most frequently
reported DRGs for inpatients for which hospitals must provide the data set out
in subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Specific categories by which hospitals shall be grouped for the purpose of
disclosing this information to the public on the Department's Internet Web
site.
(d) Beginning with the reporting period ending September 30, 2015, and annually
thereafter, Quarterly Report on Total Costs for the Most Common Surgical and Imaging
Procedures. – On a quarterly basis, each hospital and ambulatory surgical facility shall provide
to the Department, statewide data processor, utilizing electronic health records software,
information on the total costs for the 20 most common surgical procedures and the 20 most
common imaging procedures, by volume, performed in hospital outpatient settings or in
ambulatory surgical facilities, along with the related CPT and HCPCS codes. In providing
information on total costs, each hospital and ambulatory surgical facility shall include the costs
for each billable item and service associated with the procedure regardless of whether the health
service is performed by a physician or nonphysician practitioner employed by the hospital or
ambulatory surgical facility. Hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities shall report this
information in the same manner as required by subdivisions (b)(1) through (5) of this section,
provided that hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities shall not be required to report the
information required by this subsection where the reporting of that information reasonably could
lead to the identification of the person or persons admitted to the hospital in violation of the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) or other federal
law.
(e) The Commission shall adopt rules on or before March 1, 2016, to ensure that
subsection (d) of this section is properly implemented and that hospitals and ambulatory surgical
facilities report this information to the Department in a uniform manner. The rules shall include
the method by which the Department shall determine the 20 most common surgical procedures
and the 20 most common imaging procedures for which the hospitals and ambulatory surgical
facilities must provide the data set out in subsection (d) of this section.
(e1) The Commission shall adopt rules to establish and define no fewer than 10 quality
measures for licensed hospitals and licensed ambulatory surgical facilities.
(f) Upon request of a patient for a particular DRG, imaging procedure, or surgery
procedure reported in this section, a hospital or ambulatory surgical facility shall provide the
information required by subsection (b) or subsection (d) of this section to the patient in writing,
either electronically or by mail, within three business days after receiving the request.
(f1) Commission Rules. – The Commission shall adopt rules to accomplish all of the
following:
(1) To ensure that subsection (b) of this section is properly implemented and that
hospitals report this information to the statewide data processor in a uniform
manner. The rules shall include the method by which the statewide data
processor shall determine the 100 most frequently reported DRGs for
inpatients for which hospitals must provide the data set out in subsection (b)
of this section and the specific categories by which hospitals shall be grouped
for the purpose of disclosing this information to the public on the Department's
website.
(2) To ensure that subsection (d) of this section is properly implemented and that
hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities report this information to the
statewide data processor in a uniform manner. The rules shall include the
Page 4 Senate Bill 976-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
method by which the statewide data processor shall determine the 20 most
common surgical procedures and the 20 most common imaging procedures
for which the hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities must provide the
data set out in subsection (d) of this section.
(3) To establish and define no fewer than 10 quality measures for licensed
hospitals and licensed ambulatory surgical facilities.
(4) To establish procedures for the statewide data processor to receive the data
required by subsections (b) and (d) of this section and submit that data to the
Department for publication on the Department's website.
(g) G.S. 150B-21.3 does not apply to rules adopted under subsections (c) and (e)
subdivision (f1)(1) or subdivision (f1)(2) of this section. A rule adopted under subsections (c)
and (e) subdivision (f1)(1) or subdivision (f1)(2) of this section becomes effective on the last day
of the month following the month in which the rule is approved by the Rules Review
Commission."
SECTION 4.1.(b) Article 11B of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 131E-214.18. Penalty for noncompliance.
The Department may impose a civil penalty on any hospital or ambulatory surgical facility
that fails to comply with the requirements of this Article. For each day of violation, the amount
of the civil penalty shall not be (i) less than one hundredth of one percent (.01%) of the annual
salary of the chief executive officer of the noncompliant hospital or ambulatory surgical facility
or (ii) greater than two thousand dollars ($2,000). This civil penalty shall be in addition to any
fine or civil penalty that the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or other federal agency
may choose to impose on the facility. The Department shall remit the clear proceeds of civil
penalties assessed pursuant to this section to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance
with G.S. 115C-457.2."
SECTION 4.1.(c) G.S. 131E-214.4(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) A statewide data processor shall perform the following duties:
…
(8) Receive data required to be submitted by hospitals under G.S. 131E-214.13(b)
and by hospitals and ambulatory surgical facilities under G.S. 131E-214.13(d)
and submit that data to the Department of Health and Human Services
(Department) for publication on the Department's website."
SECTION 4.1.(d) This section becomes effective on the later of January 1, 2027, or
the date the rules adopted by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission under
G.S. 131E-214.13(f1)(2) take effect, and G.S. 131E-214.18, as enacted by this Part, applies to
acts occurring on or after that date. The Commission shall notify the Revisor of Statutes when
the rules required under G.S. 131E-214.13(f1)(1) and (f1)(2) take effect.
SECTION 4.2.(a) Article 11C of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, as created
by Section 3.1(a) of this act, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 131E-214.52. Patient's right to a good-faith estimate.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) CMS. – The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(2) Facility. – A hospital or ambulatory surgical facility licensed under this
Chapter.
(3) Items and services. – All items and services, including individual items and
services and service packages, that could be provided by a facility to a patient
in connection with an inpatient admission or an outpatient visit for which the
facility has established a standard charge. Examples include, but are not
limited to, all of the following:
a. Supplies and procedures.
Senate Bill 976-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Room and board.
c. Fees for use of the facility or other items.
d. Professional charges for services of physicians and nonphysician
practitioners who are employed by the facility.
e. Professional charges for services of physicians and nonphysician
practitioners who are not employed by the facility.
f. Any other items or services for which a facility has established a
standard charge.
(4) Service package. – An aggregation of individual items and services into a
single service with a single charge.
(5) Shoppable service. – A non-urgent service that can be scheduled by a patient
in advance. The term includes all CMS-specified shoppable services plus as
many additional facility-selected shoppable services as are necessary for a
combined total of at least 300 shoppable services.
(b) Good-Faith Estimate. – Upon request of any patient for a good-faith estimate for a
shoppable service, the facility shall provide to the patient, in writing, at least three business days
prior to the date the patient schedules the shoppable service, an itemized list of expected charges,
in language comprehensible to an ordinary layperson, that the patient will be obligated to pay for
all items and services related to the shoppable service. The good-faith estimate shall include the
Diagnostic Related Group (DRG), Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), or Healthcare
Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) code for each expected charge.
(c) In any case in which a patient has requested a good-faith estimate from a facility for
a shoppable service, the patient's final bill for that shoppable service shall not exceed more than
five percent (5%) of the good-faith estimate provided to the patient pursuant to this section.
(d) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this section."
SECTION 4.2.(b) This section becomes effective on the later of January 1, 2027, or
the date the rules adopted by the Department under G.S. 131E-214.52, as enacted by subsection
(a) of this section, take effect and applies to acts occurring on or after that date. The Department
shall notify the Revisor of Statutes when the rules required under G.S. 131E-214.52 take effect.

PART V. APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 5.1. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Insurance the sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement and enforce
Part I and Part II of this act.
SECTION 5.2. Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement and
enforce Parts III and IV of this act.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 6 Senate Bill 976-First Edition